Illinois, session 104th, SB1422.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Lodging Services Human Trafficking 5Recognition Training Act is amended by changing Sections 1, 5, 610, and, 15 and by adding Section 20 as follows: 7    (820 ILCS 95/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Lodging 9Services Human Trafficking Recognition Training Act.10(Source: P.A. 101-18, eff. 6-20-19; 101-499, eff. 8-23-19.) 11    (820 ILCS 95/5)12    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:13    "Department" means the Department of Human Services.14    "Employee" means a person employed by a lodging 15establishment, restaurant, or truck stop who has recurring 16interactions with the public, including, but not limited to, 17an employee who works in a reception area, performs 18housekeeping duties, helps customers in moving their 19possessions, or transports by vehicle customers of the lodging 20establishment, restaurant, or truck stop.21    "Employer" means a person or entity that operates a 22lodging establishment, restaurant, or truck stop.   SB1422 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07414 SPS 17455 b1    "Human trafficking" means the deprivation or violation of 2the personal liberty of another with the intent to obtain 3forced labor or services, procure or sell the individual for 4commercial sex, or exploit the individual in obscene matter. 5Depriving or violating a person's liberty includes substantial 6and sustained restriction of another's liberty accomplished 7through fraud, deceit, coercion, violence, duress, menace, or 8threat of unlawful injury to the victim or to another person, 9under circumstances where the person receiving or apprehending 10the threat reasonably believes that it is likely that the 11person making the threat would carry it out. 12    "Lodging establishment" means an establishment classified 13as a hotel or motel in the 2017 North American Industry 14Classification System under code 721110, and an establishment 15classified as a casino hotel in the 2017 North American 16Industry Classification System under code 721120.17    "Restaurant" means any business that is primarily engaged 18in the sale of ready-to-eat food for immediate consumption 19comprising at least 51% of the total sales, excluding the sale 20of liquor.21    "Truck stop" means an establishment intended to provide 22services to the trucking industry, including, but not limited 23to, selling fuel and food, providing showers, offering repair 24services, and offering ample room where drivers of long-haul 25trucks can park and rest. 26(Source: P.A. 101-18, eff. 6-20-19; 101-499, eff. 8-23-19;   SB1422 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07414 SPS 17455 b1102-324, eff. 1-1-22.) 2    (820 ILCS 95/10)3    Sec. 10. Human trafficking recognition training. An 4employer Beginning June 1, 2020, a lodging establishment, 5restaurant, or truck stop shall provide its employees with 6training in the recognition of human trafficking and protocols 7for reporting observed human trafficking to the appropriate 8authority. The employees shall must complete the training 9within 6 months after beginning employment in such role with 10the employer lodging establishment and every 2 years 11thereafter, if still employed by the employer lodging 12establishment. The training shall be at least 20 minutes in 13duration.14(Source: P.A. 101-18, eff. 6-20-19; 101-499, eff. 8-23-19; 15102-324, eff. 1-1-22.) 16    (820 ILCS 95/15)17    Sec. 15. Human trafficking recognition training 18curriculum. 19    (a) An employer A lodging establishment may use its own 20human trafficking training program or that of a third party 21and be in full compliance with this Act if the human 22trafficking training program includes, at a minimum, all of 23the following: 24        (1) a definition of human trafficking and commercial   SB1422 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07414 SPS 17455 b1    exploitation of children;2        (2) guidance on how to identify individuals who are 3    most at risk for human trafficking;4        (3) the difference between human trafficking for 5    purposes of labor and for purposes of sex as the 6    trafficking relates to the employer's business lodging 7    establishments; and8        (4) guidance on the role of lodging establishment 9    employees in reporting and responding to instances of 10    human trafficking.11    (b) The Department shall develop a curriculum for an 12approved human trafficking training recognition program which 13shall be used by an employer a lodging establishment that does 14not administer its own human trafficking recognition program 15as described in subsection (a). The human trafficking training 16recognition program developed by the Department shall include, 17at a minimum, all of the following: 18        (1) a definition of human trafficking and commercial 19    exploitation of children;20        (2) guidance on how to identify individuals who are 21    most at risk for human trafficking;22        (3) the difference between human trafficking for 23    purposes of labor and for purposes of sex as the 24    trafficking relates to lodging establishments; and25        (4) guidance on the role of lodging establishment 26    employees in reporting and responding to instances of   SB1422 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07414 SPS 17455 b1    human trafficking.2    The Department may consult the United States Department of 3Justice for the human trafficking recognition training program 4developed under this subsection. The Department may use a 5curriculum developed under other laws of the General Assembly 6if the curriculum satisfies the requirements of this Section.7    The Department shall develop and publish the human 8trafficking recognition training program described in this 9subsection no later than October 1, 2026 July 1, 2020.10(Source: P.A. 101-18, eff. 6-20-19; 101-499, eff. 8-23-19.) 11    (820 ILCS 95/20 new)12    Sec. 20. Penalties.13    (a) Beginning October 1, 2026, the Department, a unit of 14local government regulating an employer, or a law enforcement 15agency with jurisdiction over an employer may, in the course 16of its regulatory or enforcement duties, monitor and enforce 17compliance with this Act. Upon the discovery of a violation of 18this Act, the Department, unit of local government, or law 19enforcement agency shall provide the employer with a 20reasonable notice of noncompliance that informs the employer 21that if the employer does not cure the violation within 30 days 22after notice the employer is subject to the penalty described 23in subsection (b). The notice shall include information 24concerning where an employer can obtain the training 25curriculum developed by the Department under subsection (b) of   SB1422 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07414 SPS 17455 b1Section 15.2    (b) If the Department, a unit of local government 3regulating an employer, or a law enforcement agency with 4jurisdiction over an employer verifies that the violation was 5not corrected within the cure period described in subsection 6(a), the Attorney General or State's Attorney may bring a 7civil action against that employer. An employer that violates 8this Act is guilty of a business offense and may be fined not 9more than $1,500 for each offense.